Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 3. Shares

§ 830.
Issuance of shares.

Except as provided in section 881 of this title, a professional corporation may issue shares, fractional shares, and rights or options to purchase shares only to:

individuals who are authorized by law to render a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation;

an employee stock ownership plan as defined in section 4975(e)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, if a majority of the voting trustees of the plan are professionals licensed to furnish the pertinent professional services, and the professional corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws prohibit the direct issuance of ownership interests to anyone other than professionals licensed to furnish the pertinent professional services; or

general partnerships in which all the partners are qualified persons with respect to the professional corporation, and in which at least one partner is authorized by law in this State to render a professional service described in the corporation’s articles of incorporation.

If a licensing authority with jurisdiction over a professional corporation considers it necessary to prevent violation of the ethical standards of the profession, the authority may, by rule, restrict or condition, or revoke in part, the authority of a professional corporation, subject to its jurisdiction, to issue shares. A rule promulgated under this section does not, of itself, make a shareholder of a professional corporation, at the time the rule becomes effective, a disqualified person.

Shares issued in violation of this section or a rule promulgated under this section are void.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 831.
Notice of professional corporation status on shares.

The following statement must appear conspicuously on each share certificate issued by a professional corporation:

“The transfer of shares of a professional corporation is restricted by the Vermont Professional Corporation Chapter, and is subject to further restriction imposed from time to time by the licensing authority. Shares of a professional corporation are also subject to a statutory compulsory repurchase obligation.”

Within a reasonable time after the issuance or transfer of uncertificated shares of a professional corporation, the corporation shall send the shareholders a written notice, containing the statement required by subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 832.
Share transfer restriction.

A shareholder of a professional corporation may transfer or pledge shares, fractional shares, and rights or options for the purchase of shares of the corporation only to individuals, and general partnerships qualified under section 830 of this title to be issued shares.

A transfer of shares made in violation of subsection (a) of this section, except one made by operation of law or court judgment, is void.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 833.
Compulsory acquisition of shares after death or disqualification of shareholder.

A professional corporation must acquire (or cause to be acquired by a qualified person) the shares of its shareholder, at a price the corporation believes represents their fair value as of the date of death, disqualification, or transfer, if:

the shareholder dies;

the shareholder becomes a disqualified person, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section;

the shares are transferred by operation of law or court judgment to a disqualified person, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section.

If a price for the shares is fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws or by private agreement, that price controls. If the price is not so fixed, the corporation shall acquire the shares in accordance with section 834 of this title. If the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder rejects the corporation’s purchase offer, either the disqualified person, the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder, or the corporation may commence a proceeding under section 835 of this title to determine the fair value of the shares.

This section does not require the acquisition of shares in the event of disqualification, if the disqualification lasts no more than five months from the date the disqualification or transfer occurs.

This section and section 834 of this title do not prevent or relieve a professional corporation from paying pension benefits or other deferred compensation for services rendered to a former shareholder if otherwise permitted by law.

A provision for the acquisition of shares contained in a professional corporation’s articles of incorporation or bylaws, or in a private agreement, is specifically enforceable.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 834.
Acquisition procedure.

If shares must be acquired under section 833 of this title, the professional corporation shall deliver a written notice to the executor or administrator of the estate of its deceased shareholder, or to the disqualified person or transferee, offering to purchase the shares at a price the corporation believes represents their fair value as of the date of death, disqualification, or transfer. The offer notice must be accompanied by the corporation’s balance sheet for a fiscal year ending not more than 16 months before the effective date of the offer notice, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholder equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statement, if any.

The disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder has 30 days from the effective date of the notice to accept the corporation’s offer or demand that the corporation commence a proceeding under section 835 of this title to determine the fair value of the disqualified person’s or the estate’s shares. If the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder accepts the offer, the corporation shall make payment of the shares within 60 days from the effective date of the offer notice (unless a later date is agreed on) upon the disqualified person’s or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder’s surrender of shares to the corporation.

After the corporation makes payment for the shares, the disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder has no further interest in them.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 835.
Court action to appraise shares.

If the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder does not accept the professional corporation’s offer under subsection 834(b) of this title within the 30-day period, the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder, during the following 30-day period, may deliver a written notice to the corporation, demanding that it commence a proceeding to determine the fair value of the shares. The corporation may commence a proceeding at any time during the 60 days following the effective date of its offer notice. If it does not do so, the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder may commence a proceeding against the corporation to determine the fair value of his or her shares.

The corporation, the disqualified person, or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder shall commence the proceeding in the Superior Court of the county where the corporation’s principal office or, if none in this State, the corporation’s registered office is located. The corporation shall make the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder a party to the proceeding as in an action against the shareholder’s shares. The jurisdiction of the court in which the proceeding is commenced is plenary and exclusive.

The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers have the power described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it.

The disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder is entitled to judgment for the fair value of the shareholder’s shares determined by the court as of the date of death, disqualification, or transfer, together with interest from that date at a rate found by the court to be fair and equitable.

The court may order the judgment paid in installments determined by the court.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 836.
Court costs and fees of experts.

The court, in an appraisal proceeding commenced under section 835 of this title, shall determine all costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court, and shall assess the costs against the professional corporation. But the court may assess costs against the disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder if the court finds the disqualified person or the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased shareholder acted arbitrarily, vexatiously or not in good faith in refusing to accept the corporation’s offer.

The court may also assess the fees and expenses of counsel and experts for the disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder against the corporation and in favor of the disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder, if the court finds that the fair value of his or her shares substantially exceeded the amount offered by the corporation or that the corporation did not make an offer.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 837.
Cancellation of disqualified shares.

If the shares of a disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder are not acquired under section 834 or 835 of this title within 10 months after the death of the shareholder or within five months after the disqualification or transfer, the professional corporation shall immediately cancel the shares on its books, and the disqualified person or the estate of a deceased shareholder has no further interest as a shareholder in the corporation, other than the right to payment of the fair value of the shares under section 834 or 835 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.